District of Columbia statutes.
24-409

Federal Parole Board.

The Board of Parole created by § 723a [repealed] of Title 18, United States Code, shall have and exercise the same power and authority over prisoners convicted in the District of Columbia of crimes against the United States or now or hereafter confined in any United States penitentiary or prison (other than the penal institutions of the District of Columbia) as is vested in the District Board of Parole over prisoners confined in the penal institutions of the District of Columbia.

July 15, 1932, ch. 492, § 10
June 5, 1934, 48 Stat. 880, ch. 391

Section 723a of Title 18, U.S. Code, referred to in this section, was repealed by the Act of June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 862, Ch. 645, § 21.

The Board of Indeterminate Sentence and Parole was replaced by the Board of Parole pursuant to the Act of July 17, 1947, 61 Stat. 378, Ch. 263.

1973 Ed., § 24-209.
1981 Ed., § 24-209.